Nebraska, session 109, LB615.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB615 LB615
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 49-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
49-1401 Sections 49-1401 to 49-14,142 and section 2 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Political Accountability
and Disclosure Act.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Deceptive and fraudulent deepfake means synthetic media that
depicts a candidate or political party with the intent to injure the
reputation of the candidate or party or otherwise deceive a voter that:
(i) Appears to a reasonable person to depict a real individual
saying or doing something that did not actually occur in reality; or
(ii) Provides a reasonable person a fundamentally different
understanding or impression of the appearance, action, or speech than a
reasonable person would have from an unaltered, original version of the
image, audio recording, or video recording; and
(b) Synthetic media means an image, an audio recording, or a video
recording of an individual's appearance, speech, or conduct that has been
created or intentionally manipulated with the use of generative
adversarial network techniques or other digital technology in a manner to
create a realistic but false image, audio, or video.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a person,
corporation, committee, or other entity shall not, within ninety days
prior to an election at which a candidate for elective office will appear
on the ballot, distribute a synthetic media message that the person,
corporation, committee, or other entity knows or should have known is a
deceptive and fraudulent deepfake of a candidate or party on the state or
local ballot.
(3)(a) Subsection (2) of this section does not apply if the audio or
visual media includes a disclosure stating: This .... has been
manipulated or generated by artificial intelligence.
(b) The blank in the disclosure required by subdivision (a) of this
-2-

LB615 LB615
2025 2025
subsection shall be filled with whichever of the following terms most
accurately describes the media:
(i) Image;
(ii) Video; or
(iii) Audio.
(c) For visual media, the text of the disclosure shall appear in a
size that is easily readable by the average viewer. For visual media that
is video, the disclosure shall appear for the duration of the video.
(d) If the media consists of audio only, the disclosure shall be
read in a clearly spoken manner and in a pitch that can be easily heard
by the average listener, at the beginning of the audio, at the end of the
audio, and, if the audio is greater than two minutes in length,
interspersed within the audio at intervals of not greater than two
minutes each.
(4) A candidate whose appearance, action, or speech is depicted
through the use of a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake in violation of
subsection (2) of this section may seek injunctive or other equitable
relief prohibiting the publication of such deceptive and fraudulent
deepfake.
(5) This section does not apply to:
(a) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or
satellite television operator, programmer, or producer, that broadcasts a
deceptive and fraudulent deepfake prohibited by this section as part of a
bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, or on-the-spot
coverage of bona fide news events, if the broadcast clearly acknowledges
through content or a disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or
read by the average listener or viewer, that there are questions about
the authenticity of the materially deceptive audio or visual media, or in
cases where federal law requires broadcasters to air advertisements from
legally qualified candidates;
(b) A radio or television broadcasting station, including a cable or
-3-

LB615 LB615
2025 2025
satellite television operator, programmer, or producer, when it is paid
to broadcast a deceptive and fraudulent deepfake and has made a good
faith effort to establish the depiction is not a deceptive and fraudulent
deepfake, or in cases where federal law requires broadcasters to air
advertisements from legally qualified candidates;
(c) An Internet website, or a regularly published newspaper,
magazine, or other periodical of general circulation, including an
Internet or electronic publication, that routinely carries news and
commentary of general interest, and that publishes materially deceptive
audio or visual media prohibited by this section, if the publication
clearly states that the materially deceptive audio or visual media does
not accurately represent the speech or conduct of the candidate; or
(d) Materially deceptive audio or visual media that constitutes
satire or parody.
Sec. 3. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 4. Original section 49-1401, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-